glossing/lexicons/preverbs.lexc
@U.V.iv@мыԓытыԓяк:@U.V.iv@м%{ы%}ԓытыԓя INTER-V ;        ! to walk swiftly
@U.V.tv@рыймэтковык:@U.V.tv@рыймэтков INTER-V ;        ! to put
@U.V.iv@кээрэк:@U.V.iv@кээрэ INTER-V ;        ! to detect by feeling
@U.V.iv@выток:@U.V.iv@выто INTER-V ;        ! to eat leaves, to eat verdure
@U.V.iv@и'ннычьэпитык:@U.V.iv@и'ннычь%{Æ%}пит INTER-V ;        ! to somersault
@U.V.iv@ӈиныԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@ӈиныԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to be young
@U.V.iv@йыԓӄичичивык:@U.V.iv@йыԓӄичичив INTER-V ;        ! to doze of exhaustion
@U.V.iv@э’ӄэԓиӈэтык:@U.V.iv@э’ӄ%{Æ%}ԓиӈ%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to fear
@U.V.iv@а’ӄанӈэнавык:@U.V.iv@а’ӄанӈэнав INTER-V ;        ! to be furious
@U.V.iv@вэтгавчетык:@U.V.iv@вэтгавчет INTER-V ;        ! to chatter
@U.V.iv@гэкэӈык:@U.V.iv@гэкэӈ INTER-V ;        ! to lead a team of reindeer
@U.V.iv@о'птынкэръок:@U.V.iv@о'птынкэръо INTER-V ;        ! to grow darker (of the night)
@U.V.tv@пэчайвык:@U.V.tv@пэчайв INTER-V ;        ! to leave too small clothes
@U.V.iv@аӈӄаӄэтык:@U.V.iv@аӈӄаӄэт INTER-V ;        ! to freeze (of the sea)
@U.V.iv@йъэԓигук:@U.V.iv@йъ%{Æ%}ԓигу INTER-V ;        ! to eat raw eggs
@U.V.iv@ӄэймрэнръук:@U.V.iv@ӄэймр%{Æ%}нръу INTER-V ;        ! to begin (of the gnat period)
@U.V.tv@рытэкичгувык:@U.V.tv@рыт%{Æ%}кичгув INTER-V ;        ! to feed with meat
@U.V.iv@кэгытрыпԓыткук:@U.V.iv@к%{Æ%}гытрыпԓытку INTER-V ;        ! to regain consciousness
@U.V.tv@тэӈычвик:@U.V.tv@т%{Æ%}ӈычви INTER-V ;        ! to part
@U.V.iv@урэԓейвыткук:@U.V.iv@ур%{Æ%}ԓейвытку INTER-V ;        ! to wander
@U.V.iv@коргытвэк:@U.V.iv@коргытвэ INTER-V ;        ! to cheer up
@U.V.iv@ачьэӄок:@U.V.iv@ачьэӄо INTER-V ;        ! to catch a long-tailed duck
@U.V.tv@пынрык:@U.V.tv@пынр INTER-V ;        ! to reward
@U.V.iv@чыӄук:@U.V.iv@чыӄу INTER-V ;        ! то еat cold meat
@U.V.tv@егтэнтик:@U.V.tv@егт%{Æ%}нти INTER-V ;        ! to step on s.o.’s foot
@U.V.iv@йыӈаръочгатык:@U.V.iv@й%{ы%}ӈаръочгат INTER-V ;        ! to be covered by a thick fog
@U.V.iv@рынноԓьатык:@U.V.iv@рынноԓьат INTER-V ;        ! to make war
@U.V.iv@тыԓвыръук:@U.V.iv@тыԓвыръу INTER-V ;        ! to burn
@U.V.iv@варэнпатык:@U.V.iv@варэнпат INTER-V ;        ! to pitch yaranga tripods
@U.V.tv@рэԓӄынток:@U.V.tv@рэԓӄынто INTER-V ;        ! to take out the contents of a reindeer stomach
@U.V.tv@ръачӈыток:@U.V.tv@ръачӈыто INTER-V ;        ! to exclaim
@U.V.iv@тъыԓыӈӈок:@U.V.iv@тъыԓыӈӈо INTER-V ;        ! to fall ill
@U.V.iv@йъууткук:@U.V.iv@йъуутку INTER-V ;        ! to play with a string on the fingers
@U.V.tv@рырыԓгаԓятык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}рыԓгаԓят INTER-V ;        ! to lay
@U.V.iv@риттиԓыткувык:@U.V.iv@риттиԓыткув INTER-V ;        ! to flap
@U.V.iv@пыԓчимгъучьэтык:@U.V.iv@пыԓчимгъучь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to be kind
@U.V.iv@онмыԓӄатык:@U.V.iv@онмыԓӄат INTER-V ;        ! to go deep into
@U.V.iv@ӄаанԓек:@U.V.iv@ӄаанԓе INTER-V ;        ! to pasture
@U.V.iv@кэвычьэтык:@U.V.iv@кэвычьэт INTER-V ;        ! to get accustomed
@U.V.tv@рыӄамэнток:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ӄамэнто INTER-V ;        ! to serve
@U.V.tv@рыпэԓӄынтэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}пэԓӄынтэв INTER-V ;        ! to bring back
@U.V.tv@ёсӄычатык:@U.V.tv@ёсӄычат INTER-V ;        ! to put abruptly
@U.V.iv@айыԓгыръок:@U.V.iv@айыԓгыръо INTER-V ;        ! то get scared
@U.V.iv@йыӄэвык:@U.V.iv@й%{ы%}ӄэв INTER-V ;        ! to grow stronger
@U.V.iv@гичивԓейвык:@U.V.iv@гичивԓейв INTER-V ;        ! to have a walk merrily
@U.V.tv@ройӈэмтэӈык:@U.V.tv@ройӈэмтэӈ INTER-V ;        ! try to throw down
@U.V.iv@энарынӈатык:@U.V.iv@энарынӈат INTER-V ;        ! to plane
@U.V.tv@ынэтоԓьатык:@U.V.tv@ынэтоԓьат INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.iv@тэргыръок:@U.V.iv@тэргыръо INTER-V ;        ! to sob
@U.V.tv@ӈаткынатык:@U.V.tv@ӈаткынат INTER-V ;        ! to seat somebody on a sledge
@U.V.iv@умкыгиӈэтык:@U.V.iv@умкыгиӈ%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! укрываться под кустами, угԓубԓяться в кусты
@U.V.tv@ръыԓӄэптурэвык:@U.V.tv@ръыԓӄ%{Æ%}птур%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to unnail
@U.V.iv@йыпытвак:@U.V.iv@йыпытва INTER-V ;        ! to be drunk
@U.V.tv@тэӈэӈинмык:@U.V.tv@тэӈ%{Æ%}ӈинм INTER-V ;        ! to bless
@U.V.iv@тармачьыӈматак:@U.V.iv@тармачьыӈмата INTER-V ;        ! to marry against one’s will, to rape
@U.V.iv@выегачатык:@U.V.iv@выегачат INTER-V ;        ! to smoke
@U.V.iv@апаӄатԓытвак:@U.V.iv@апаӄатԓытва INTER-V ;        ! to be lying flat on one’s stomach
@U.V.iv@рамкыԓьытвак:@U.V.iv@рамкыԓьытва INTER-V ;        ! to be on a visit
@U.V.tv@энапэԓяк:@U.V.tv@энапэԓя INTER-V ;        ! to leave
@U.V.tv@йычгынтурэвык:@U.V.tv@йычгынтур%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to dislocate one‘s joint
@U.V.iv@ԓеԓеԓпэрак:@U.V.iv@ԓеԓеԓпэра INTER-V ;        ! to turn yellow
@U.V.tv@ыԓпытэгнук:@U.V.tv@ыԓпыт%{Æ%}гну INTER-V ;        ! to hit s.o.’s cheek
@U.V.iv@эԓечейвык:@U.V.iv@эԓечейв INTER-V ;        ! en été)
@U.V.tv@аргыпык:@U.V.tv@аргып INTER-V ;        ! to lance a boil under a reindeer hoof
@U.V.tv@танпыԓгытрыӈык:@U.V.tv@танпыԓгытрыӈ INTER-V ;        ! to stroke
@U.V.iv@ӄаӈокэргыпык:@U.V.iv@ӄаӈокэргып INTER-V ;        ! to put a spotty kerker on
@U.V.iv@пынԓёчемгъок:@U.V.iv@пынԓёчемгъо INTER-V ;        ! to ask oneself
@U.V.tv@о'мраймэтык:@U.V.tv@о'мраймэт INTER-V ;        ! to grip
@U.V.iv@танымытвараӈык:@U.V.iv@танымытвараӈ INTER-V ;        ! to build houses
@U.V.iv@ыԓвук:@U.V.iv@ыԓву INTER-V ;        ! то slaughter a wild reindeer
@U.V.tv@инэтриԓык:@U.V.tv@ин%{Æ%}триԓ INTER-V ;        ! to add
@U.V.tv@тэнуйгытвык:@U.V.tv@т%{Æ%}нуйгытв INTER-V ;        ! to skin /a ringed seal/
@U.V.iv@гыроръок:@U.V.iv@гыроръо INTER-V ;        ! to begin (of the spring)
@U.V.iv@вээмчурмэтык:@U.V.iv@вэ%{Æ%}мчурм%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to go near а river bank
@U.V.iv@вичгытэтык:@U.V.iv@вичгыт%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to decompose, to decay
@U.V.iv@кыттанӈыткок:@U.V.iv@кыттанӈытко INTER-V ;        ! to burst into laughter
@U.V.iv@тангагԓыӈыткок:@U.V.iv@тангагԓыӈытко INTER-V ;        ! to urge
@U.V.iv@кымъувчирык:@U.V.iv@кымъувчир INTER-V ;        ! to crumple
@U.V.tv@тъарыӈпэнрык:@U.V.tv@тъарыӈпэнр INTER-V ;        ! to abuse
@U.V.iv@выйитиӈук:@U.V.iv@в%{ы%}йитиӈу INTER-V ;        ! to smell
@U.V.tv@рымъэйӈэткук:@U.V.tv@рымъэйӈ%{Æ%}тку INTER-V ;        ! to shout in a threatening way
@U.V.iv@моԓԓывэттыԓьатык:@U.V.iv@моԓԓывэттыԓьат INTER-V ;        ! to drip (of blood)
@U.V.iv@увинтык:@U.V.iv@увинт INTER-V ;        ! to feed a fire
@U.V.iv@кыԓявтак:@U.V.iv@к%{ы%}ԓявта INTER-V ;        ! to сross running
@U.V.iv@ичичивык:@U.V.iv@ичичив INTER-V ;        ! to become exhausted
@U.V.iv@чериритԓек:@U.V.iv@чериритԓе INTER-V ;        ! to dirty
@U.V.iv@рэвымрэвук:@U.V.iv@рэвымр%{Æ%}ву INTER-V ;        ! to catch partridges
@U.V.tv@рыԓӄутэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ԓӄут%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to stand, to pitch
@U.V.iv@тыԓенэӈэткук:@U.V.iv@тыԓенэӈ%{Æ%}тку INTER-V ;        ! to sail
@U.V.iv@анӈэнӈынваӈэк:@U.V.iv@анӈэнӈынваӈэ INTER-V ;        ! to grumble
@U.V.tv@гыйивӄэвык:@U.V.tv@г%{ы%}йивӄ%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to mark
@U.V.tv@роратвавъяак:@U.V.tv@%{R%}оратвавъяа INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.tv@кыԓвыкэԓик:@U.V.tv@кыԓвык%{Æ%}ԓи INTER-V ;        ! to draw
@U.V.tv@рывъентовык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}въентов INTER-V ;        ! let air out
@U.V.iv@а'ԓяёк:@U.V.iv@а'ԓяё INTER-V ;        ! to defecate
@U.V.tv@риԓгитык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}иԓгит INTER-V ;        ! to hang
@U.V.iv@кымԓергатык:@U.V.iv@кымԓергат INTER-V ;        ! to be covered with underfur
@U.V.iv@торпэԓятык:@U.V.iv@торпэԓят INTER-V ;        ! to remain for the first time
@U.V.iv@ӄивчек:@U.V.iv@ӄивче INTER-V ;        ! to hurry up
@U.V.tv@таӈойӈыӈык:@U.V.tv@таӈойӈыӈ INTER-V ;        ! to strike, to beat
@U.V.tv@рыгагчаватык:@U.V.tv@рыгагчават INTER-V ;        ! to precipitate
@U.V.tv@рырыткувык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}рыткув INTER-V ;        ! to shoot
@U.V.tv@ԓьумык:@U.V.tv@ԓьум INTER-V ;        ! to hollow
@U.V.iv@и'мпытурэк:@U.V.iv@и'мпытур%{Æ%} INTER-V ;        ! to hold up one’s head
@U.V.iv@ръэԓянток:@U.V.iv@ръэԓянто INTER-V ;        ! to gallop out
@U.V.iv@рэчьэтык:@U.V.iv@рэчьэт INTER-V ;        ! to get entangled
@U.V.iv@кытыйгытватык:@U.V.iv@к%{ы%}тыйгытват INTER-V ;        ! to sow the wind, to put a hood on
@U.V.tv@ръыттъыёԓявык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}ъыттъыёԓяв INTER-V ;        ! to bode
@U.V.tv@рымэрынрэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}мэрынрэв INTER-V ;        ! to slow down
@U.V.iv@инэнтигыԓгыръувык:@U.V.iv@ин%{Æ%}нтигыԓгыръув INTER-V ;        ! to bite, to harass
@U.V.iv@тымгыпэчгатык:@U.V.iv@тымгыпэчгат INTER-V ;        ! to feel a lump in one’s throat
@U.V.iv@э’птыткук:@U.V.iv@%{Æ%}’птытку INTER-V ;        ! to move one’s feet
@U.V.iv@ивԓетык:@U.V.iv@ивԓет INTER-V ;        ! to grow longer
@U.V.tv@рыпэԓӄынтэтык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}пэԓӄынтэт INTER-V ;        ! to recover
@U.V.iv@ԓеԓюнимэтык:@U.V.iv@ԓеԓюним%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to shave
@U.V.tv@рыӄытвэтык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ӄытвэт INTER-V ;        ! to put to cool
@U.V.iv@кэтгучьэтык:@U.V.iv@к%{Æ%}тгучь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to be strong
@U.V.iv@мэмыԓёк:@U.V.iv@мэмыԓё INTER-V ;        ! to catch ringed seals
@U.V.iv@кэԓитэйкык:@U.V.iv@к%{Æ%}ԓит%{Æ%}йк INTER-V ;        ! to write down
@U.V.iv@авэръэпык:@U.V.iv@авэръэп INTER-V ;        ! to dress
@U.V.iv@кыквырак:@U.V.iv@кыквыра INTER-V ;        ! to stiffen
@U.V.iv@ойӈыпыԓвэк:@U.V.iv@ойӈыпыԓвэ INTER-V ;        ! to cut a wick
@U.V.iv@выячеэгатык:@U.V.iv@в%{ы%}ячеэгат INTER-V ;        ! to blow (of a blizzard of fresh snow)
@U.V.tv@мычеткук:@U.V.tv@м%{ы%}четку INTER-V ;        ! to break into pieces
@U.V.tv@рыпагъёвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}пагъёв INTER-V ;        ! to make sth
@U.V.iv@э’гнопык:@U.V.iv@э’гноп INTER-V ;        ! to bend down one’s head
@U.V.iv@ейвэԓевык:@U.V.iv@ейвэԓев INTER-V ;        ! to be orphaned
@U.V.tv@рымумкыԓтурэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}мумкыԓтур%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to unfasten
@U.V.tv@рычеԓгавык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}чеԓгав INTER-V ;        ! to draw in red colour
@U.V.iv@ԓыгэԓычьэтык:@U.V.iv@ԓ%{ы%}гэԓычьэт INTER-V ;        ! to beware of
@U.V.iv@э’ӄэгитэткук:@U.V.iv@э’ӄ%{Æ%}гит%{Æ%}тку INTER-V ;        ! to mock
@U.V.tv@рывичвэвык:@U.V.tv@рывичв%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.tv@рынэк:@U.V.tv@рынэ INTER-V ;        ! то drive off
@U.V.iv@койӈыԓвэк:@U.V.iv@койӈыԓвэ INTER-V ;        ! to leave tea in one’s cup
@U.V.iv@гыткатъыԓык:@U.V.iv@гыткатъыԓ INTER-V ;        ! to have a leg ache
@U.V.iv@вэнварэрык:@U.V.iv@вэнварэр INTER-V ;        ! to look for footprints
@U.V.iv@инэнэювык:@U.V.iv@инэн%{Æ%}юв INTER-V ;        ! to save, to revive
@U.V.iv@тэминӈык:@U.V.iv@т%{Æ%}минӈ INTER-V ;        ! to know how to do sth
@U.V.tv@рывъёԓьавык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}въёԓьав INTER-V ;        ! to subdue
@U.V.iv@маравыткок:@U.V.iv@маравытко INTER-V ;        ! to wage war from time to time
@U.V.iv@инэнъюк:@U.V.iv@ин%{Æ%}нъю INTER-V ;        ! to be on guard
@U.V.tv@рымгоӈатык:@U.V.tv@рымгоӈат INTER-V ;        ! to begin
@U.V.iv@кэнъэӄэгчыкутык:@U.V.iv@кэнъэӄ%{Æ%}гчыкут INTER-V ;        ! to enter a creek
@U.V.iv@ирвэтык:@U.V.iv@ирв%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to become sharp
@U.V.iv@эвъянвыткок:@U.V.iv@эвъянвытко INTER-V ;        ! to make an incantation, to act by incantation
@U.V.iv@тыӄиԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@т%{ы%}ӄиԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to shine
@U.V.iv@выянтатык:@U.V.iv@в%{ы%}янтат INTER-V ;        ! to break out from the team
@U.V.iv@ытчатрык:@U.V.iv@ытчатр INTER-V ;        ! to relax
@U.V.iv@ювъэчитык:@U.V.iv@ювъ%{Æ%}чит INTER-V ;        ! to go round (of sacred bones and teeth)
@U.V.iv@тигыԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@тигыԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to ski
@U.V.tv@пытӄынъюнэвык:@U.V.tv@пытӄынъюнэв INTER-V ;        ! to rekindle
@U.V.iv@рыквытык:@U.V.iv@рыквыт INTER-V ;        ! to be cramped for space
@U.V.iv@чаёмакатык:@U.V.iv@чаёмакат INTER-V ;        ! to meet to drink tea
@U.V.iv@инэнтэӈытвэтык:@U.V.iv@инэнтэӈытв%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to improve
@U.V.iv@вэривэтык:@U.V.iv@в%{Æ%}рив%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.iv@гыԓгычыкутык:@U.V.iv@гыԓгычыкут INTER-V ;        ! to penetrate into a skin
@U.V.iv@откочьыткоӈӈок:@U.V.iv@откочьыткоӈӈо INTER-V ;        ! to go and to set traps
@U.V.tv@ранӈытвэвык:@U.V.tv@ранӈытвэв INTER-V ;        ! to pour off water
@U.V.iv@рэԓԓетытвак:@U.V.iv@рэԓԓетытва INTER-V ;        ! to hang
